Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1,110
Diagnostic laboratory of Animal Health Research Center; fee schedule for services.

The diagnostic laboratory of the University of Nebraska Animal Health Research Center shall establish a fee schedule showing fees to be charged for various diagnostic and testing services performed by the laboratory.

Laws 1976, LB 869, § 5.